Tennessee statutes. Title 46 Cemeteries
Chapter 6

Veterans' Cemeteries

46-6-101. Establishment.

The department of veterans services shall provide for Tennessee veterans' cemeteries.

It is the legislative intent that the department, in consultation with the department of finance and administration and other appropriate state departments and agencies, shall, within existing state resources, identify any available state-owned real property and other available financial resources to establish a veterans' cemetery in each of the three (3) grand divisions.

The department of veterans services is authorized to establish additional veterans' cemeteries, as needed, by using state resources in accordance with the planning criteria of the United States department of veterans’ affairs (USDVA) and the national cemetery administration (NCA) in order to receive federal grant funding to assist with establishment of additional veterans' cemeteries.

Acts 1987, ch. 309, § 1; 2013, ch. 73, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Cross-References. Grand divisions of state, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

46-6-102. Acceptance and use of funds.

The department of veterans services is authorized to accept any private or public funds, including appropriations, to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

The department is further authorized to use any funds or other assistance made available to the department to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Any person working for or representing the department shall not:

Solicit contributions, donations, or gifts from the public for the benefit of state veterans' cemeteries; or

Authorize the use of the person's name or the name of the department by an individual or organization engaged in any campaign raising money for state veterans' cemeteries.

Any offer of donation or gift to or for the benefit of state veterans' cemeteries shall be unconditional and made in writing in accordance with a procedure established by the department.

Acts 1987, ch. 309, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, § 7; 2016, ch. 715, § 1.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

46-6-103. Application for federal grant.

In establishing Tennessee veterans' memorial cemeteries, it is the intention of the general assembly that the state shall apply for a grant from the United States administrator of veterans' affairs pursuant to Public Law 95-476, 92 Stat. 1504, and the department of veterans services is authorized to submit the application on behalf of the state.

Acts 1987, ch. 309, § 2; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 95-476, 92 Stat. 1504, referred to in this section, is codified as 38 U.S.C. § 2408.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

46-6-104. Construction — Expenditure of funds.

This chapter shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this chapter unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act or otherwise made available in accordance with § 46-6-101.

Acts 1987, ch. 309, § 3.

46-6-105. Eligibility for interment.

Eligibility for interment in a state veterans' cemetery shall be determined under 38 U.S.C. § 2402.

Acts 2016, ch. 715, § 2.

46-6-106. Commissioner of veterans services — Promulgation of rules.

The commissioner of veterans services is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2016, ch. 715, § 3.

46-6-107. Fees.

The department of veterans services shall not charge a fee for the interment of a veteran who is eligible for interment in a Tennessee veterans' cemetery under the department's guidelines.

The department may charge a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) for the interment of an eligible veteran's spouse; provided, that the department shall not charge a fee for the interment of the eligible veteran's most recent spouse.

Acts 2016, ch. 915, § 1; 2018, ch. 1017, § 1; 2019, ch. 513, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 513, § 2 provided that the act applies to interments occurring on or after June 3, 2019.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.